Connecticut, session 2026, SB00287.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
2 (1) "Home health aide agency" has the same meaning as provided in
3 section 19a-490 of the general statutes, (2) "home health aide employee"
4 means a person (A) who is employed as a home health aide by a home
5 health aide agency, or (B) with whom such agency has contracted to
6 provide home health aide services on behalf of such agency, (3) "home
7 health aide services" has the same meaning as provided in section 19a-
8 490 of the general statutes, and (4) "personal protective equipment"
9 includes, but is not limited to, disposable gloves, hand sanitizers,
10 aprons, gowns, foot covers, face shields, N95 masks or higher rated
11 masks certified by the National Institute for Occupational Safety and
12 Health and surgical masks.
13 (b) Each home health aide agency shall provide each home health
14 aide employee, at no cost, personal protective equipment that is
15 necessary to safely provide home health aide services to each client of a
SB287 / File No. 78 1

SB287 File No. 78
16 home health aide employee.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
AGE Joint Favorable
SB287 / File No. 78 2

SB287 File No. 78
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which requires home health aide agencies to provide their
home health aide employees and contractors certain personal protective
equipment (PPE) for no cost, does not result in a fiscal impact to the
state.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB287 / File No. 78 3

SB287 File No. 78
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 287
AN ACT REQUIRING HOME HEALTH AIDE AGENCIES TO PROVIDE
CERTAIN PERSONAL PROTECTIVE EQUIPMENT TO HOME
HEALTH AIDES.